Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.360

Oath of office.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

Every person elected or appointed to the office of school director, before entering upon the discharge of the duties thereof, shall take an oath or affirmation to support the Constitution of the United States and the state of Washington and to faithfully discharge the duties of the office according to the best of his or her ability. In case any official has a written appointment or commission, the official's oath or affirmation shall be endorsed thereon and sworn to before any officer authorized to administer oaths. School officials are hereby authorized to administer all oaths or affirmations pertaining to their respective offices without charge or fee. All oaths of office, when properly made, shall be filed with the county auditor. Every person elected to the office of school director shall begin his or her term of office at the first official meeting of the board of directors following certification of the election results.

[ 1990 c 33 s 314; 1988 c 187 s 1; 1986 c 167 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.322. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 288 s 11; RRS s 4786; prior: 1897 c 118 s 61; 1890 p 380 s 70. Formerly RCW 28A.315.500, 28A.57.322, 28.58.095, 28.63.015, 28.63.017, 42.04.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.